Utah statutes.
63C-7-204.   Powers of the board.
The board shall:
(1)  adopt bylaws by a majority vote of its members which vote of both member
representatives and state representatives may be made by proxy as prescribed
in the bylaws;
(2)  elect 10 member representatives to the executive committee, except that
the state representatives are not permitted to vote in that election;
(3)  recommend to the executive committee broad policies for the long-term
construction and operation of the communications network; and
(4)  dissolve the Utah Communications Agency Network as provided in Section
63C-7-209.
